src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX T  ti      ian iojoje      ti       
SFX T  ti      ian iojoj       ti       
SFX T  ti      ian iosioms     ti       
SFX T  ti      ian i sias      ti       
SFX T  ti      ian iosiomis    ti       
SFX T  ti      ian iosiose     ti       
SFX T ti      tas             ti        
SFX T ti      to              ti        
SFX T ti      tam             ti        
SFX T ti      t               ti        
SFX T ti      tu              ti        
SFX T ti      tame            ti        
SFX T ti      ti              ti        
SFX T ti      tiems           ti        
SFX T ti      tus             ti        
SFX T ti      tais            ti        
SFX T ti      tuose           ti        
SFX T ti      ta              ti        
SFX T ti      tos             ti        
SFX T ti      tai             ti        
SFX T ti      toje            ti        
SFX T ti      toj             ti        
SFX T ti      toms            ti        
SFX T ti      tomis           ti        
SFX T ti      tose            ti        
SFX T tis     tasi            tis       
SFX T ti      tasis           ti        
SFX T ti      tojo            ti        
SFX T ti      tajam           ti        
SFX T ti      t j             ti        
SFX T ti      tuoju           ti        
SFX T ti      tajame          ti        
SFX T ti      tieji           ti        
SFX T ti      t j             ti        
SFX T ti      tiesiems        ti        
SFX T ti      tuosius         ti        
SFX T ti      taisiais        ti        
SFX T ti      tuosiuose       ti        
SFX T ti      toji            ti        
SFX T ti      tosios          ti        
SFX T ti      tajai           ti        
SFX T ti      t j             ti        
SFX T ti      t ja            ti        
SFX T ti      tojoje          ti        
SFX T ti      tojoj           ti        
SFX T ti      tosioms         ti        
SFX T ti      t sias          ti        
SFX T ti      tosiomis        ti        
SFX T ti      tosiose         ti        
SFX T ti      simas           [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simo            [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simam           [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sim             [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simu            [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simame          [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simi            [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sim             [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simiems         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simus           [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simais          [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simuose         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sima            [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simos           [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simai           [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simoje          [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simoj           [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simoms          [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simomis         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simose          [^  sz]ti 
SFX T  ti      imas            ti       
SFX T  ti      imo             ti       
SFX T  ti      imam            ti       
SFX T  ti      im              ti       
SFX T  ti      imu             ti       
SFX T  ti      imame           ti       
SFX T  ti      imi             ti       
SFX T  ti      im              ti       
SFX T  ti      imiems          ti       
SFX T  ti      imus            ti       
SFX T  ti      imais           ti       
SFX T  ti      imuose          ti       
SFX T  ti      ima             ti       
SFX T  ti      imos            ti       
SFX T  ti      imai            ti       
SFX T  ti      imoje           ti       
SFX T  ti      imoj            ti       
SFX T  ti      imoms           ti       
SFX T  ti      imomis          ti       
SFX T  ti      imose           ti       
SFX T  ti      imas            ti       
SFX T  ti      imo             ti       
SFX T  ti      imam            ti       
SFX T  ti      im              ti       
SFX T  ti      imu             ti       
SFX T  ti      imame           ti       
SFX T  ti      imi             ti       
SFX T  ti      im              ti       
SFX T  ti      imiems          ti       
SFX T  ti      imus            ti       
SFX T  ti      imais           ti       
SFX T  ti      imuose          ti       
SFX T  ti      ima             ti       
SFX T  ti      imos            ti       
SFX T  ti      imai            ti       
SFX T  ti      imoje           ti       
SFX T  ti      imoj            ti       
SFX T  ti      imoms           ti       
SFX T  ti      imomis          ti       
SFX T  ti      imose           ti       
SFX T zti     simas           zti       
SFX T zti     simo            zti       
SFX T zti     simam           zti       
SFX T zti     sim             zti       
SFX T zti     simu            zti       
SFX T zti     simame          zti       
SFX T zti     simi            zti       
SFX T zti     sim             zti       
SFX T zti     simiems         zti       
SFX T zti     simus           zti       
SFX T zti     simais          zti       
SFX T zti     simuose         zti       
SFX T zti     sima            zti       
SFX T zti     simos           zti       
SFX T zti     simai           zti       
SFX T zti     simoje          zti       
SFX T zti     simoj           zti       
SFX T zti     simoms          zti       
SFX T zti     simomis         zti       
SFX T zti     simose          zti       
SFX T sti     simas           sti       
SFX T sti     simo            sti       
SFX T sti     simam           sti       
SFX T sti     sim             sti       
SFX T sti     simu            sti       
SFX T sti     simame          sti       
SFX T sti     simi            sti       
SFX T sti     sim             sti       
SFX T sti     simiems         sti       
SFX T sti     simus           sti       
SFX T sti     simais          sti       
SFX T sti     simuose         sti       
SFX T sti     sima            sti       
SFX T sti     simos           sti       
SFX T sti     simai           sti       
SFX T sti     simoje          sti       
SFX T sti     simoj           sti       
SFX T sti     simoms          sti       
SFX T sti     simomis         sti       
SFX T sti     simose          sti       
SFX T ti      simasis         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simojo          [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simajam         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sim j           [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simuoju         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simajame        [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simieji         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sim j           [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simiesiems      [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simuosius       [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simaisiais      [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simuosiuose     [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simoji          [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simosios        [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simajai         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sim j           [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sim ja          [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simojoje        [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simojoj         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simosioms       [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sim sias        [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simosiomis      [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      simosiose       [^  sz]ti 
SFX T  ti      imasis          ti       
SFX T  ti      imojo           ti       
SFX T  ti      imajam          ti       
SFX T  ti      im j            ti       
SFX T  ti      imuoju          ti       
SFX T  ti      imajame         ti       
SFX T  ti      imieji          ti       
SFX T  ti      im j            ti       
SFX T  ti      imiesiems       ti       
SFX T  ti      imuosius        ti       
SFX T  ti      imaisiais       ti       
SFX T  ti      imuosiuose      ti       
SFX T  ti      imoji           ti       
SFX T  ti      imosios         ti       
SFX T  ti      imajai          ti       
SFX T  ti      im j            ti       
SFX T  ti      im ja           ti       
SFX T  ti      imojoje         ti       
SFX T  ti      imojoj          ti       
SFX T  ti      imosioms        ti       
SFX T  ti      im sias         ti       
SFX T  ti      imosiomis       ti       
SFX T  ti      imosiose        ti       
