src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
aimanuoti/NTXdefijklouvx
akompanuoti/NTX
alpti/NTXade
angliuotis/T
apdraikalioti/STX
apib gti/NTX
apipinti/NTX
apmal inti/STX
apsigirdyti/STX
apsiliuobti/STX
apskritinti/NTXk
ardyti/NSTXabdefijkpquw
a trintis/T
atidumti/NTX
atkraginti/STX
atsigaivelioti/NTX
atsikvo  ti/NTX
atskelti/STX
auk tinti/NSTXdefhjkprv
bad tis/T
baladoti/NSTXdfkopqw
banguoti/NTXeko
baug tis/T
bepro iauti/NTX
birbyniuoti/NTX
blandyti/STX
bl sti/NTXdjk
bod tis/T
bra k ti/NTXbcdefgkl
brinkyti/NTX
br zginti/NTX
bukinti/NTXbj
buvin ti/NTX
cimpin ti/NTX
dabin tis/T
dalyvauti/NTXfkv
daug od iauti/NTX
degeneruoti/NTX
demaskuoti/NSTX
dervuotis/T
did iuoti/STX
dimbinti/NTXe
diskriminuoti/NTX
docentauti/NTX
dr s ti/NTXcdfik
drenuoti/NTXd
drybsoti/NTXbdfitvx
druskuoti/STX
dulksnoti/NTX
duob ti/NTX
dvazg ti/NTX
dzagnoti/NTX
eidin ti/NTXabcdeghijl
engtis/T
fiksuotis/T
gaidryti/STX
gal sti/NSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
garbanotis/T
gastroliuoti/NTX
geisti/NTXox
g r tis/T
gimdyti/NTXbdfjrv
girsnoti/NTX
glabstyti/NTX
glem ti/STXjkvw
gl doti/NTX
gobti/NTX
gramdyti/NTXadjk
gr bti/NTXabdefjl
griebtis/T
gr  tis/T
gr moti/NTXfj
guginti/NSTX
guod iotis/T
g  tel ti/NTX
idarytis/T
importuoti/NTXq
inspiruoti/NTX
irkluoti/NTX
i daigoti/STX
i intis/Tf
i laipinti/STX
i pelenuoti/STX
i sibaltinti/STX
i sigalabinti/STX
i silie ti/STX
i sipl kti/STX
i taigauti/NTX
ygzti/NTX
joti/NSTXabcdefghijkl
juosin ti/NTX
kai ioti/NTX
kakti/NTXbdefgkls
kam ioti/NTXl
kaprizyti/STX
karpuoti/NTX
k stel ti/NTX
kau ti/NTXeil
kek ti/NTX
kep  ti/NTX
kervoti/NTX
kiauroti/NTX
kilstel ti/NTX
kirdyti/STXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kit ti/NTXf
ky oti/NTX
klausin ti/NSTXadfhklmnpqrwx
kleketuoti/NTX
klibintis/T
kliuktel ti/NTX
klonuotis/T
knaibin ti/NTX
knerptis/T
kni psoti/NTX
kolektyvinti/NTXk
konfliktuoti/NTXfk
kopijuoti/NSTXehkqtv
krakmolyti/NTX
kratytis/T
kreknoti/NTX
krik tytis/T
kryk ti/NTXk
kr pti/NTX
kukenti/NTX
kumptel ti/NTX
k printis/T
ku t ti/NTXf
kvankin ti/NTX
kv ptel ti/NTX
kvosti/NTXadhp
laisv ti/NTX
languoti/NTX
lauk ti/NTXk
l kdinti/NTX
lervoti/NTXdel
lietuv ti/NTXk
lipdin ti/NTX
li sti/NTXe
lopyti/NTXaf
maginti/NTX
makotis/T
manytis/T
ma inuoti/NTXd
maus ioti/NTX
m gintis/T
mel tis/T
miaugzti/NTX
miltuoti/NTX
mirti/NTXadelr
mokestinti/NTXad
movin ti/NTX
murk lenti/NTX
nagrin ti/NSTXdefhpr
na lai iauti/NTX
ne dintis/T
nir inti/NTX
niveliuoti/NTXk
nubrozdinti/STX
nukal ti/NTX
nuolaid iauti/NTX
nusibraukyti/STX
nusim  ti/STX
nusi vengti/NTX
nu ym ti/NTX
paaug ti/NTX
pagardinti/STX
pai ytis/T
pakrikdytis/T
pama inti/STX
papildin ti/NTX
parpuoti/NTX
pa al ti/NTX
pasidieva yti/NTX
pasikamanoti/STX
pasimurdyti/STX
pasisiekti/STX
pasity ioti/NTX
pasmeigti/STX
patentuoti/NTX
pavogti/STX
pelnikauti/NTXr
perrikiuoti/NTX
pe tel ti/NTX
piktintis/T
piptel ti/NTX
pypti/NTXk
plaukti/NTXabcdefghijkl
plerps ti/NTXk
pliau kinti/NTXfk
pliups ti/NTX
plmektis/T
plu  ti/NTXbf
porinti/NTX
pralinksminti/NTX
prasiplep ti/STX
pra vingti/NTX
priet miauti/NTX
prilesti/STX
pri  lti/STX
prisikalbinti/STX
prisiplep ti/STX
prisi veisti/STX
prismeigti/STX
prival ti/NTX
proteguoti/NTX
puknoti/NTX
pups ti/NTXk
pusbad iauti/NTX
p tuoti/NTX
rai iotis/T
ramintis/T
rasnoti/NTX
raustel ti/NTX
regresuoti/NTX
remilitarizuoti/NTX
r stis/T
riboti/NSTXablmn
rikti/NTXklm
riukinti/NTX
rop ti/STXnopqsvx
rungtyniauti/NTX
rutulti/NTX
saldyti/NTX
sanuoti/NTX
s din ti/NTX
semlioti/NTX
siaustis/T
simbolizuotis/T
siurbtel ti/NTX
skaitin tis/T
skend ti/NTX
skl sti/NTXl
skutoti/NTX
smaginti/NSTXcfortv
smuk ioti/NTX
spart ti/NTXfk
spjautis/T
sr btel ti/NTX
stemb ti/NTX
stovyklauti/NTX
suarin ti/STX
sugr  inti/STX
sul kti/STX
supeluoti/STX
s rti/NTX
susidilginti/STX
susimasinti/STX
susisprausti/STX
su vank ti/NTX
svaigtel ti/NTX
taisyti/NSTXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
tarnautis/T
tek lenti/NTX
t stis/T
tirdinti/NTX
to iauti/NTX
tremti/NTXde
triptel ti/NTX
t kstel ti/NTX
tvankinti/NTX
ugdytis/T
u gaidauti/NTX
u plei tuoti/STX
u silupti/NTX
u vo ti/STX
vaiskinti/NTX
vapenti/NTX
vauktel ti/NTX
v luotis/T
vetuoti/NTXefl
vilkauti/NTX
virstel ti/NTX
vogdinti/NTX
zuiti/NTX
